Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3224.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 181.9445, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Employee. "Employee" means any person who is employed by an employer, including temporary and part-time employees, who is anticipated by the employer to perform work for at least 80 hours in a year for that employer in Minnesota. Employee does not include: (1) an independent contractor; (2) an individual who is a volunteer firefighter or paid on-call firefighter, with a department charged with the prevention or suppression of fires within the boundaries of the state; is a volunteer ambulance attendant as defined in section 144E.001, subdivision 15; or is an ambulance service personnel as defined in section 144E.001, subdivision 3a, who serves in a paid on-call position; (3) an individual who is an elected official or a person who is appointed to fill a vacancy in an elected office as part of a legislative or governing body of Minnesota or a political subdivision; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (4) an individual employed by a farmer, family farm, or a family farm corporation to provide physical labor on or management of a farm if the farmer, family farm, or family farm corporation employs the individual to perform work for 28 days or less each yeardeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (5) any individual in a position for which the United States Department of Transportation has power to establish qualifications and maximum hours of service under United States Code, title 49, section 31502. new text end